Massachusetts, session 194th, S695.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 175 of the General Laws is hereby amended by adding at the end thereof the
following section:-
"Section 226. A licensed athletic trainer, acting with a referral from a physician, who acts
within the scope of practice authorized by law shall not be denied reimbursement by the health
insurer for those covered services if the health insurer would reimburse another health care
provider for those services. This Section pertains only to those health plans that provide coverage
for a particular type of health service, or for any particular medical condition that is within the
scope of practice of licensed athletic trainers.
Services provided by licensed athletic trainers may be subject to reasonable deductibles,
co-payment and co-insurance amounts, fee or benefit limits, practice parameters, and utilization
of 2

review consistent with applicable rules adopted by the division of insurance; provided that the
amounts, limits, and review shall not function to direct treatment in a manner unfairly
discriminative against athletic trainer care, and collectively shall be no more restrictive than
those applicable under the same policy for care or services provided by other health care
providers.
Nothing in this section shall be construed as impeding or preventing either the provision
or coverage of health care services by licensed athletic trainers within the lawful scope of athletic
trainer practice.
As used in this section, “health insurance plan” means an individual or group health
insurance policy, a hospital or medical service corporation or health maintenance organization
subscriber contract, or another health benefit plan offered, issued, or renewed for a person by a
health insurer. The term shall not include benefit plans providing coverage for specific disease or
other limited benefit coverage."
of 2